Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1474
License; suspension or revocation, when; civil penalty; imposed, when; appeal.

(1) The board may suspend or revoke the license of any licensee under the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act upon a finding that any such licensee has violated the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act.

(2) The board may impose and collect a civil penalty against any licensee if the board finds that such licensee has violated the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act. Such civil penalty shall not exceed five thousand dollars for each violation of the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act. All civil penalties collected by the board shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

(3) Any suspension, revocation, or imposition under this section may be appealed by the licensee. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 33.
October 1, 2026
Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, see section 60-1401.